New York, session 2025-2026, A1168.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 101-c 2 to read as follows: 3 § 101-c. Statewide registry of mental hygiene and child supervision 4 residential facilities. 1. The department of state shall establish and 5 maintain a statewide registry of mental hygiene and child supervision 6 residential facilities. Such registry shall be composed of the name and 7 address of every residential housing facility: 8 a. subject to supervision of the office of children and family 9 services pursuant to article nineteen-G of this chapter; 10 b. subject to regulation of the office of mental health pursuant to 11 the mental hygiene law; 12 c. subject to the regulation of the office for people with develop- 13 mental disabilities; and 14 d. subject to the regulation of the office of addiction services and 15 supports. 16 2. Commencing on the first of January, two thousand twenty-six and on 17 the first of every other month thereafter, the offices of children and 18 family services, mental health, addiction services and supports, and the 19 office for people with developmental disabilities shall submit to the 20 department of state a list of the name and address of every residential 21 housing facility subject to the jurisdiction of such office, which is 22 required to be included in the statewide registry of mental hygiene and 23 child supervision residential facilities pursuant to subdivision one of 24 this section. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02393-01-5 A. 1168 2 1 3. The statewide registry of mental hygiene and child supervision 2 residential facilities shall be regularly updated and maintained in an 3 accurate manner by the department of state. Such department shall make 4 the registry available to the general public in print, electronic form 5 and on a website maintained by the department. 6 4. The department of state shall transmit a copy of the statewide 7 registry of mental hygiene and child supervision residential facilities 8 to the legislature not less than twice each year. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect January 1, 2026. Effective immediate- 10 ly, any actions necessary to implement the provisions of this act on its 11 effective date are authorized to be completed on or before such date.